Idaho, session 2025, H0150.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 55-1007, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 10, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-1007, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-1007. CONVEYANCE OR ENCUMBRANCE BY A MARRIED COUPLE. The homestead
of a married person shall not be conveyed or encumbered by a spouse without
the consent of the other spouse. Either spouse may execute a power of attor-
ney authorizing the other spouse to convey or encumber the homestead on be-
half of the principal. Consent shall be evidenced by:
(1) Each spouse executing and acknowledging the instrument by which the
homestead is conveyed or encumbered; or
(2) A deed from one spouse to the other spouse establishing the home-
stead property as the sole and separate property of the grantee spouse.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.